Maine, session 132, LD1930.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §214 is enacted to read:
§214. Unborn children
1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
A. "Conception" means the fusion of a human spermatozoon with a human ovum.
B. "Gestation" means the time during which a pregnant person carries an unborn child
in the pregnant person's womb, from conception to birth.
C. "Unborn child" means the offspring of human beings from conception until birth.
2. For purposes of sections 201 to 203 and 207 to 208-F, the term "person" or "human
being" includes an unborn child at every stage of gestation from conception until live birth.
3. This section does not apply to:
A. An act committed by the mother of an unborn child;
B. A lawful medical procedure performed by a physician or other licensed medical
professional at the request of a mother of an unborn child or the mother's legal guardian;
or
C. The lawful dispensation or administration of lawfully prescribed medication.